Utah statutes.
4-9-5.2.   Adopting uniform packaging and labeling regulation.

Unless modified by the department, the Uniform Packaging and Labeling Regulation, adopted by the National Conference on Weights and Measures in Handbook 130, Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Engine Fuel Quality, National Institute of Standards and Technology, shall apply to packaging and labeling in the state.

